src/import/adjectives.lexc
tunnetatav+A:tunnetatav MAGUS ;
tunnustatav+A:tunnustatav MAGUS ;
tunnustav+A:tunnustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tuntav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´untav MAGUS ;
turgutav+A:turgutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tuttav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´uttav MAGUS ;
tutvustav+A:tutvustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõendav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õendav MAGUS ;
tõestatav+A:t´õestatav MAGUS ;
tõkestav+A:tõkestav MAGUS ;
tõlgendatav+A:tõlgendatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõmbav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õmbav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõmblev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õmblev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõmbuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õmbuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõotav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õotav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõrjuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õrjuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõrkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õrkuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõtlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õtlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõttav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õttav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõukav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õukav MAGUS ;
täheldatav+A:täheldatav MAGUS ;
täidetav+A:täidetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@täiendav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@täiendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@täituv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´äituv MAGUS ;
täpsustav+A:täpsustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tärkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ärkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tögav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tögav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@töötav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´öötav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@töötlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´öötlev MAGUS ;
tülgastav+A:tülgastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tüssav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´üssav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tüütav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´üütav MAGUS ;
uimastav+A:uimastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@uinuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´uinuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ujuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@ujuv MAGUS ;
ulatuv+A:ulatuv MAGUS ;
uljutsev+A:ul,jutsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ulpiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ul,piv MAGUS ;
unistav+A:unistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@uppuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´uppuv MAGUS ;
usaldatav+A:usaldatav MAGUS ;
usaldav+A:usaldav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ustav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ustav MAGUS ;
uudistav+A:uudistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@uuriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´uuriv MAGUS ;
vaadeldav+A:vaadeldav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaagiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aagiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaatav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aatav MAGUS ;
vabandatav+A:vabandatav MAGUS ;
vabandav+A:vabandav MAGUS ;
vabanev+A:vabanev MAGUS ;
vabastav+A:vabastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaevav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aevav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaevlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aevlev MAGUS ;
vahelduv+A:vahelduv MAGUS ;
vahetatav+A:vahetatav MAGUS ;
vahetuv+A:vahetuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ahtiv MAGUS ;
vahutav+A:vahutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaieldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vaieldav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaikiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aikiv MAGUS ;
vaimustav+A:vaimustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vajav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vajav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vajuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vajuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@valdav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aldav MAGUS ;
valendav+A:valendav MAGUS ;
valetav+A:valetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@valev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@valev MAGUS ;
valgustav+A:valgustav MAGUS ;
valitav+A:valitav MAGUS ;
valitsev+A:valitsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@valiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@valiv MAGUS ;
valjenev+A:val,jenev MAGUS ;
vallandatav+A:vallandatav MAGUS ;
vallutav+A:vallutav MAGUS ;
valmistatav+A:val,mistatav MAGUS ;
valmistuv+A:val,mistuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@valmiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´al,miv MAGUS ;
valutav+A:valutav MAGUS ;
vananev+A:vananev MAGUS ;
vangistav+A:vangistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vankuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ankuv MAGUS ;
vapustav+A:vapustav MAGUS ;
varastav+A:varastav MAGUS ;
varisev+A:varisev MAGUS ;
varitsev+A:varitsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@varjav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´arjav MAGUS ;
vastanduv+A:vastanduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vastav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´astav MAGUS ;
vastutav+A:vastutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vedav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vedav MAGUS ;
vedelev+A:vedelev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@veerev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´eerev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@veetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´eetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@veetlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´eetlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vehkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ehkiv MAGUS ;
venitatav+A:venitatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@veniv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@veniv MAGUS ;
veretav+A:veretav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@verev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@verev MAGUS ;
veritsev+A:veritsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vetruv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´etruv MAGUS ;
vibreeriv+A:vibr´eeriv MAGUS ;
vihatav+A:vihatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vihjav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ihjav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vihkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ihkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@viibiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´iibiv MAGUS ;
vilisev+A:vilisev MAGUS ;
viljastav+A:vil,jastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vilkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ilkuv MAGUS ;
vingerdav+A:vingerdav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vinguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´inguv MAGUS ;
virgutav+A:virgutav MAGUS ;
virvendav+A:virvendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@visklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´isklev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vohav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vohav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vonklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´onklev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@voogav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´oogav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@voolav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´oolav MAGUS ;
vuhisev+A:vuhisev MAGUS ;
võbelev+A:võbelev MAGUS ;
võbisev+A:võbisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@võetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´õetav MAGUS ;
võidetav+A:võidetav MAGUS ;
võidutsev+A:võidutsev MAGUS ;
võimaldav+A:võimaldav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@võistlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´õistlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@võitlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´õitlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@võiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´õiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@võluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@võluv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@võrdlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´õrdlev MAGUS ;
võrreldav+A:võrreldav MAGUS ;
võõrandatav+A:võõrandatav MAGUS ;
võõrastav+A:võõrastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vägev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vägev MAGUS ;
vähendatav+A:vähendatav MAGUS ;
vähendav+A:vähendav MAGUS ;
väidetav+A:väidetav MAGUS ;
välditav+A:väl,ditav MAGUS ;
välistav+A:välistav MAGUS ;
väljendav+A:väl,jendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@väljuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´äl,juv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@välkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´älkuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vältav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ältav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vältiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´äl,tiv MAGUS ;
värisev+A:värisev MAGUS ;
värskendav+A:värskendav MAGUS ;
väsitav+A:väsitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@väänduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´äänduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@väänlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´äänlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vääriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ääriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´aetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@andev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´andE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@haisev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´aisE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@haistev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´aistE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@heitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´eitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hoidev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´oidE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüüdev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´üüdE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jooksev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´ooksE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jootev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´ootE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jõudev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´õudE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jättev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´ättE2v MAGUS ;
kaheldav+A:kaheldav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kaitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´aitsE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kandev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´andE2v MAGUS ;
kardetav+A:kardetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kartev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´artE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kastev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´astE2v MAGUS ;
kasutatav+A:kasutatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kattev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´attE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keetev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eetE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kestev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´estE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kiitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´iitE2v MAGUS ;
kirjutatav+A:kirjutatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@koitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´oitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kostev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ostE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kurtev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´urtE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´uulE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@köitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´öitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kündev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ündE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@küttev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´üttE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@laitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´aitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@laskev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´askE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@laulev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´aulE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@leidev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´eidE2v MAGUS ;
lepitav+A:lepitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@liitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´iitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@loitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´oitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lootev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ootE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõppev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õppE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@läitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´äitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lüpsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l´üpsE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aitsE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maksev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aksE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mattev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´attE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@murdev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´urdE2v MAGUS ;
